pt-BR: Tipo de calçador de máquina de costura: Fita de viés ajustável; Miçangas; Fita de viés; Fita; Bainha com ponto invisível; Trançado; Casa de botão; Transparente; Cordão; Acolchoamento; Cerzido; Ponto cruz; Movimento livre; Franja; Gathering; Hemmer; Zíper invisível; Antiaderente; Aberto na frente; Overcasting; Pérola; Pintuck; Nervura; Acolchoado; Bainha enrolada; Rolo; Fixação circular; Babado; Ponto de cetim; Lantejoulas; Franzido; Smocking; Aplicação de fita; Teflon; Ponto alto; Pregas; Walking; Debrum; Ziguezague; Zíper; Outro
bg-BG: Тип краче за шиене: Регулируем подгъв; Изшиване с мъниста; Предпазен подгъв; Подгъв; Сляп подгъв; Сплитане на плитки; Бутониера; Прозрачно; Кординг; Диван; Замрежване; Зашиване на ръбове; Свободно движение; Ресни; Събиране; Подгъване; Невидим цип; Незалепващо покритие; Отворен пръст; Преливане; Перла; Pintuck; Кантиране; Капитониране; Навит подгъв; Валяк; Кръгло закрепване; Рюфлер; Сатенен бод; Пайети; Ширинг; Изглаждане; Подлепване; Тефлон; Горен бод; Басти; Ходещ бод; Скрит шев; Зигзаг; Цип; Други
ja: ミシンの押えの種類: 調整可能なバイアスバインダー; ビーズ加工; バイアスバインダー; バインダー; ブラインドヘム; ブレーディング; ボタンホール; クリア; コーディング; カウチング; ダーニング; エッジステッチング; フリーモーション; フリンジ; ギャザー; ヘマー; インビジブルジッパー; ノンスティック; オープントップ; オーバーキャスティング; パール; ピンタック; パイピング; キルティング; ロールヘム; ローラー; カーブ用押さえ; ラフラー; サテンステッチ; シークイン; シャーリング; スモッキング; テーピング; テフロン; トップステッチ; タック; ウォーキング; ウェルト; ジグザグ; ジッパー; その他
cs: Typ patky pro šicí stroj: Nastavitelná předpětí; Korálkování; Šikmé vazače; Vazač; Slepý lem; Oplétání; Knoflíková dírka; Průhledný; Šňůrování; Couching; Zapošívání; Šití na okraji; Volný pohyb; Třásně; Shrnování; Lemovač; Neviditelný zip; Nepřilnavé; Otevřená špička; Overcasting; Perleť; Pintuck; Piping; Prošívání; Rolovaný lem; Váleček; Kulatý nástavec; Vlnovka; Saténový steh; Cínová patka; Třásňový steh; Smocking; Páskování; Teflon; Horní steh; Tucks; Kráčející; Welt; Cikcak; Zip; Jiné
el: Τύπος ποδιού ραπτικής: Ρυθμιζόμενο bias συνδετικό; Συσκευή αναδίπλωσης; Bias συνδετικό; Βιβλιοδέτης; Τυφλό στρίφωμα; Κοτσίδες; Κουμπότρυπα; Διάφανη; Καλώδιο; Καθαρισμός; Καταρα; Ραφή άκρων; Ελεύθερη κίνηση; Κροσσός; Συγκέντρωση; Κρασπεδώτης; Αόρατο φερμουάρ; Αντικολλητικό; Ανοικτό πάνω μέρος; Συννεφιά; Πέρλα; Pintuck; Σωλήνωση; Καπιτονέ; Ρολό στρίφωμα; Με κυλίνδρους; Στρογγυλό εξάρτημα; Ταραξίας; Σατέν βελονιά; Πούλια; Σιράρισμα; Πιέτες; Taping; Τεφλόν; Τοπβελονάκι; Πιέτες; Περίπατος; Κράσπεδο; Τσακιστή γραμμή με γωνίας; Φερμουάρ; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de pé de costura: Fichário de viés ajustável; Missangas; Fichário de viés; Fichário; Bainha cega; Trança; Casa de botão; Cristalino; Cordão; Descanso; Calcador; Costura de borda; Movimento livre; Franja; Coletor; Bainha; Fecho invisível; Antiaderente; Dedo do pé aberto; Nublado; Pérola; Ponto decorativo; Tubulação; Acolchoamento; Bainha enrolada; Com rolo; Acessório redondo; Apoio; Ponto de cetim; Lantejoulas; Franzido; Remate; Fita; Teflon; Ponto alto; Dobras; De pé; Solda; Ziguezague; Fecho; Outro
it: Tipo di piedino della macchina da cucire: Bordatore in sbieco regolabile; Imperlatura; Bordatore in sbieco; Bordatore; Orlo cieco; Intrecciatura; Asola; Trasparente; Cordatura; Couching; Rammendo; Cuciture bordi; Movimento libero; Orlo; Arricciatura; Orlatura; Cerniera invisibile; Non antiaderente; Piedino aperto; Sopraffilo; Perlato; Pieghe; Piping; Impuntitura; Orlo arrotolato; Rullo; Accessorio rotondo; Increspatura; Punto raso; Lustrino; Shirring; Nido d’ape; Nastratura; Teflon; Impuntura; Ripresa; Doppio trasporto; Guardolo; Zig-zag; Zipper; Altro
sk-SK: Typ šijacej pätky: Nastaviteľný šikmý viazač; Korálkovanie; Šikmý viazač; Viazač; Slepý lem; Pletenie vrkočov; Gombíková dierka; Pätka priehľadná; Lemovanie; Ploché vyšívanie; Látanie; Okrajové prešívanie; Voľný pohyb; Lem; Zhromažďovanie; Neviditeľný lem; Neviditeľný zips; Nepriľnavý; Otvorená špička; Zapošitie; Perlový; Záhyb; Lemovanie pruhom; Prešívanie; Rolovaný lem; Valček; Kruhové vyšívanie; Nazberkaná látka; Saténový steh; Flitre; Riasenie; Naberanie látky; Tejpovanie; Teflón; Obšívanie; Záhyby; Pätka; Welt; Zigzag; Zips; Iné
fr: Type de pied presseur: Semelle pose biais réglable; Perlage; Semelle pose biais; Semelle; Ourlet invisible; Tressage; Boutonnière; Clair; Cordage; Couchage; Reprise; Point de croix; Mouvement libre; Frange; Rassemblement; Ourleur; Fermeture éclair invisible; Anti-adhérent; Nu pieds; Surfilage; Perle; Pied plisseur; Passepoil; Piquage; Ourlet roulé; Rouleau; Attache ronde; Fronceur; Point satin; Paillette; Fronces; Smocks; Pose ruban; Téflon; Surpiqûre; Replis; Marcheur; Poche à rabat; Zig zag; Fermeture éclair; Autre
ro-RO: Tip picioruș de cusut: Bentiță bias reglabilă; Mărgele; Bentiță bias; Bentiță neformată; Tiv orb; Împletitură; Butonieră; Transparent; Cordoane; Cusături decorative; Stopat; Cusătură pe margine; Mișcare liberă; Franjuri; Înnădire; Tivit/pliat margini; Fermoar invizibil; Anti-aderent; Vârf deschis; Surfilare; Sidefat; Pliuri ornamentale; Paspoaluri; Matlasare; Tiv rulat; Tip rolă; Accesoriu rotund; Volane; Cusătură de satin; Paiete; Încrețire; Cusătură tip fagure; Acoperire cu panglică; Teflon; Tighel; Pense; Alimentare uniformă cu material; Bordură; Zigzag; Fermoar; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta stopice za šivanje: Podesiva stopica za kosu traku; Umetanje perlica; Stopica za kosu traku; Stopica; Slijepi bod; Našivanje pletenica; Rupica za gumb; Prozirno; Našivanje niti; Ušivanje uske vrpce; Štopanje; Šivanje rubova; Slobodno-ručno; Ukrašavanje; Nabiranje; Običan porub; Skriveni zatvarač; Neprianjajuća; Otvorena; Porubljivanje/endlanje; Ušivanje perli; Pintuck; Izrada cijevi; Prošivanje; Zarolani rub; Valjak; Okrugli dodatak; Plisiranje; Satinski bod; Šljokice; Skupljanje; Smocking; Ušivanje traka; Teflon; Rubni ubod; Nabori; Hodajuća; Oblaganje; Cik-cak; Patentni zatvarač; Ostalo
hu: Varrótalp típusa: Állítható előfeszítő kötőanyag; Gyöngyfűzés; Előfeszítő kötőanyag; Kötőanyag; Vakszegély; Fonás; Gomblyuk; Átlátszó; Zsinórozás; Alátűzés; Beszövés; Szegélyvarrás; Szabad mozgás; Rojt; Beráncolás; Szegő; Láthatatlan cipzár; Tapadásmentes; Nyitott talp; Overlock; Gyöngy; Tűránc; Paszpolvarrás; Foltvarrás; Görgős szegély; Görgő; Kerek kiegészítő; Redőző; Szaténöltés; Flitter; Ráncolás; Húzott hímzés; Szalagolás; Teflon; Felsőöltés; Redők; Sétáló; Zsebfedél; Cikcakk; Cipzár; Egyéb
pl: Typ stopki do szycia: Regulowane spoiwo polaryzujące; Koraliki; Odchylenie spoiwa; Spoiwo; Obszycie nieprzelotowe; Warkocz; Dziurka od guzika; Przezroczysty; Sznur; Wszywanie; Cerowanie; Zszywanie krawędzi; Swobodny ruch; Granice; Zebranie; Hemmer; Niewidoczny zamek błyskawiczny; Nieprzywierająca; Open-toe; Zachmurzenie; Perła; Zaszewka; Orurowanie; Pikowanie tkanin; Podwinięty dół; Wałek; Okrągłe mocowanie; Falbana; Ścieg satynowy; Cekin; Marszczący się; Marszczenie; Uszczelnianie taśmą; Teflon; Ścieg górny; Fałdy; Chodzenie; Obrzęk; Zygzak; Zamek błyskawiczny; Pozostałe
es: Tipo de pie de costura: Encuadernadora al bies ajustable; Cuentas; Carpeta al bies; Aglutinante; Dobladillo invisible; Trenza; Ojal; Clara; Cordón; Aplicación de cintas; Remiendo; Puntada de borde; Movimiento libre; Fleco; Fruncido; Hilvanador; Cremallera invisible; Antiadherente; Puntera abierta; Sobrehilado; Cordoncillo; Pliegue decorativo; Piping; Colchas; Dobladillo enrollado; Rodillo; Accesorio redondo; Volante; Puntada satinada; Lentejuela; Frisado; Nido de abeja; Cintas; Teflón; Pespunte; Pliegues; Caminar; Faldón; Zigzag; Cremallera; Otros
sv: Typ av sömnadsfot: Justerbar pärm; Beading; Bias binder; Binder; Blindfåll; Flätning; Knapphål; Genomskinlig; Cording; Couching; Darning; Kantsömmar; Fri rörelse; Frans; Sammanfogning; Fåll; Osynlig dragkedja; Non-stick; Öppen tå; Overcasting; Pärla; Pintuck; Revär; Kviltning; Rullfåll; Roller; Runt fäste; Ruffler; Satängsöm; Paljett; Shirring; Smockning; Tejpning; Teflon; Toppstygn; Indragningar; Gående; Bård; Zigzag; Dragkedja; Annat
ru: Тип лапки швейной машины: Регулируемая косая бейка; Для бисера; Косая бейка; Сшивание; Потайная подгибка; Плетение; Петля для пуговицы; Прозрачный; Шнуровка; Пришивание; Штопка; Краевая строчка; Свободное движение; Бахрома; Сборка; Рубчик; Потайная молния; Антипригарное покрытие; Открытый носок; Оверлок; Для жемчуга; Защипы; Кант; Лоскутное шитье; Подгиб; Ролик; Круглая насадка; Раффлер; Сатин; Пайетки; Сборка; Сборка; Тесьма; Тефлон; Отстрочка; Защипы; Шагающая; По краю; Зигзаг; Молния; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta šivalne tačke: Nastavljiva za obrobni trak; Šivanje perl; Obrobni trak; Paspuliranje; Za slepi šiv; Pletenje; Gumbnice; Prozorna; Vrvice; Polaganje (vezenje); Prostoročno vezenje; Sešivanje robov; Prosti šiv; Odprta (fringe); Nabiranje; Robljenje; Za skrite zadrge; Teflonska; Odprta; Overcast; Šivanje perl; Drobne gubice; Paspuliranje; Prešivanje; Roliran rob; Valjček; Okrogel nastavek; Gubanje; Satin; Šivanje ploščatih bleščic; Za nabiranje; Nabiranje; Robljenje; Teflonska; Pokrivni šiv; Gubice; Zgornji transport; Okrepljen šiv; Cik-cak; Zadrga; Drugo
da: Syfodstype: Justerbar bias-binder; Perler; Bias-binder; Binder; Blind søm; Fletning; Knaphul; Klar; Ledning; Couching; Darning; Kantsyning; Fri bevægelighed; Frynser; Samling; Hemmer; Usynlig lynlås; Non-stick; Åben tå; Overcasting; Perle; Pintuck; Piping; Quilting; Rullesøm; Rulle; Rund fastgørelse; Ruffler; Satin søm; Paillet; Rynding; Smocking; Taping; Teflon; Topsyning; Tucks; Vandrende; Svejsning; Zigzag; Lynlås; Andet
nl: Naaivoettype: Verstelbare biaisband; Kralen; Biasband; Binder; Blinde zoom; Vlechtwerk; Knoopsgat; Transparant; Koord; Opnaaien; Stopwerk; Stiksels aan de randen; Vrije beweging; Zoom; Verzamelen; Zoomvoetje; Onzichtbare rits; Anti-kleef; Open teen; Overhandse naad; Parel; Fijne figuurnaad; Biesversiering; Quilten; Gerolde zoom; Roller; Ronde bevestiging; Rimpel; Satijnsteek; Pailletten; Plooien; Smokwerk; Tapen; Teflon; Doorgestikt; Plooien; Wandelen; Boorden; Zigzag; Ritssluiting; Andere
de: Nähfußtyp: Verstellbarer Schrägbinder; Perlenstickerei; Schrägbinder; Bindemittel; Blindsaum; Flechtung; Knopfloch; Transparent; Cording; Plattstickerei; Stopfen; Randnähen; Freie Bewegung; Randbereich; Raffen; Säumer; Versteckter Reißverschluss; Anti-Haftend; Offener Nähfuß; Umsäumen; Handnähmaschine; Biesen; Paspel; Steppen; Rollsaum; Rollfuß; Runder Aufsatz; Rüschen; Plattstich; Paillette; Kräuseln; Smoken; Kleben; Teflon; Topstitch; Biese; Filzen; Rahmen; Zickzack; Reißverschluss; Sonstiges
fi: Ompelukoneen paininjalkatyyppi: Säädettävä vinonauhankiinnityslaite; Helmikoristelu; vinonauhankiinnityslaite; kiinnityslaite; piilo-ommel; Letitys; Napinläpi; Läpinäkyvä; nauhoitus; nyörikirjonta; parsiminen; Reunojen tikkaus; Vapaa liike; Hapsut; Kokoontuminen; Hemmer; Näkymätön vetoketju; Tarttumaton; Avokärki; huolittelu; Helmeilevä; hiuslaskos; tere; Täkkien valmistus; Rullattu helma; Rulla; Kaareva kiinnitys; laskostaja; Satiiniommel; Paljetti; Rypytys; Rypytys; nauhoittaminen; Teflon; tikkaus; laskokset; yläsyöttäjä; varjokaitale; Siksak; Vetoketju; Muu
ko: 재봉틀 발 유형: 조절식 바이어스 바인더; 구슬; 바이어스 바인더; 바인더; 블라인드 밑단; 땋기; 단추 구멍; 투명; 밧줄; 카우칭; 감침질; 엣지 스티칭; 프리 모션; 술; 수집; 헤머; 보이지 않는 지퍼; 붙지 않음; 오픈 토; 휘갑치기; 펄; 핀턱; 파이핑; 퀼팅; 말아올린 밑단; 롤러; 라운드 부착; 러플러; 새틴 스티치; 스팽글; 셔링; 스모킹; 테이핑; Teflon; 탑스티치; 턱; 워킹; 부푼 자국; 지그재그; 지퍼; 기타
nb: Syfottype: Justerbar kantbånd; Sy perler; Kantbånd; Kant; Skjult kant; Fletting; Knapphull; Gjennomsiktig; Ledning; Nedlegging; Stopping; Kantsøm; Frihånd; Frynser; Samling; Hemmer; Usynlig glidelås; Ikke-klebende; Åpen syfot; Overcasting; Perle; Pintuck; Piping; Quilting; Rullet kant; Rulle; Rund festing; Ruffler; Satengsøm; Paljett; Shirring; Smocking; Taping; Teflon; Topstitch; Folder; Transportør; Welt; Sikksakk; Glidelås; Annen
zh-CN: 缝纫压脚类型: 可调偏角绑定器; 串珠; 偏角绑定器; 绑定器; 盲缝; 编织; 扣眼; 透明; 滚边; 挑绣; 织补; 车边线; 自由运动; 边缘; 褶皱; 卷边; 隐形拉链; 不粘; 露趾; 包边缝纫; 珍珠; 针裥; 嵌边; 绗缝; 卷边下摆; 滚筒; 圆形配件; 褶边; 缎线针法; 亮片; 抽褶; 缩褶; 镶边; Teflon; 明线; 衬褶; 步行式; 贴边; 齿形; 拉链; 其他
tr: Dikiş Ayağı Tipi: Ayarlanabilir çapraz şerit; Boncuklu; Çapraz şerit; Bağlayıcı; Kör kenar; Örgü; Düğme; Berrak; Kordon; Hasır; Örme; Kenar dikişi; Serbest hareket; Saçak; Toplama; Kenar baskısı; Görünmez fermuar; Yapışmaz; Açık uçlu ayak; Sürfile dikişi; İnci; Süslü pli; Biye; Kapitone; Kıvrılmış kenar; Rulman; Yuvarlak aparat; Fırfırlı; Saten dikiş; Payet; Büzgülü; Büzgü dikişi; Bantlama; Teflon; Üst dikiş; Kıvrımlar; Yürüme; Şerit; Zigzag; Fermuar; Diğer
zh-TW: 縫紉壓腳類型: 可調式偏置活頁夾; 串珠; 偏移黏合劑; 活頁夾; 暗針縫; 編織; 扣眼; 透明; 繩索; 沙發; 織補; 十字繡; 自由動作; 邊緣; 蒐集; 縫邊器; 隱形拉鍊; 不沾黏; 露趾; 包邊; 珍珠; 壓腳; 滾邊; 絎縫; 捲邊下擺; 滾軸; 圓形附件; 褶邊; 緞面繡; 亮片平縫; 抽褶; 疏縫; 編帶; Teflon; 明線; 縫褶襉; 針趾; 貼邊; 之字形; 拉鍊; 其他
lt-LT: Siuvimo mašinos pėdelės tipas: Reguliuojama siuvimo juosta; Karoliukai; Siuvimo juosta; Segiklis; Paslėpta siūlė; Pynė; Skylutė sagai; Skaidri; Apsiuvimas; Siuvinėjimas; Adymas; Kraštų apsiuvimas; Laisvai judanti; Kutai; Raukimas; Apvadai; Paslėptas užtrauktukas; Nelipni; Atvira pėdelė; Overlokinė; Prisiuvimo; Dekoratyvinio dygsnio; Kantavimo; Dygsniavimo; Susuktas apsiuvas; Pėdelė su ratuku; Apvalus priedas; Kantavimo; Atlasinis dygsnis; Blizgučiai; Susiraukimo; Raukučiai; Juostos prisiuvimas; Teflonas; Viršutinė siūlė; Klostės; Žingsniuojanti; Siuvimo ir raukimo; Zigzagas; Užtrauktukas; Kita
en: Sewing foot type: Adjustable bias binder; Beading; Bias binder; Binder; Blind hem; Braiding; Buttonhole; Clear; Cording; Couching; Darning; Edge stitching; Free motion; Fringe; Gathering; Hemmer; Invisible zipper; Non-stick; Open toe; Overcasting; Pearl; Pintuck; Piping; Quilting; Rolled hem; Roller; Round attachment; Ruffler; Satin stitch; Sequin; Shirring; Smocking; Taping; Teflon; Topstitch; Tucks; Walking; Welt; Zigzag; Zipper; Other
th: ประเภทตีนผี: เครื่องต่อผ้าเฉลียงแบบปรับได้; การประดับลูกปัด; เครื่องต่อผ้าเฉลียง; เครื่องต่อผ้า; ขอบตะเข็บซ่อน; การถัก; รังดุม; โปร่งใส; คอร์ดิ้ง; เคาชิ่ง; ดาร์นิ่ง; การเย็บขอบ; แบบฟรีโมชั่น; ตะเข็บ; เกเตอริ่ง; เฮมเมอร์; ซิปซ่อน; ไม่เกาะติด; เปิดนิ้วเท้า; สำหรับวัดระยะ; ไข่มุก; ตีเกล็ด; ไปปิ้ง; การควิลท์; ขอบแบบม้วน; ลูกกลิ้ง; ติดรูปทรงกลม; จับจีบ; การปักทึบ; เลื่อม; จีบย่น; ยางสม็อค; การพันเทป; เทฟลอน; ตะเข็บด้านบน; จีบผ้า; การเดิน; ผ้าบาง; ซิกแซก; ซิป; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại chân vịt máy may: Chân may đường vải chéo điều chỉnh; Chân may đính hạt; Chân may đường vải chéo; Chân may đường viền; Chân may đường vải ẩn; Chân may tết; Chân may nút áo; Chân may trong suốt; Chân may lồng dây; Chân may đính chỉ; Chân may vá; Chân may đường mép; Chân may tự do; Chân may tua; Chân may lấy chun; Chân may hình búa; Chân may khóa kéo ẩn; Chống dính; Chân may hở mũi; Chân may vắt sổ; Chân may đính ngọc; Chân may xếp li nhỏ; Chân may viền ống; May chần; Chân may viền cuốn; Chân may cuốn; Đính kèm hình tròn; Chân may gợn sóng; Chân may mũi satin; Chân may đính sequin; Chân may nhúm vải; Chân may smock; Chân may bọc viền; Chân may Teflon; Chân may may nổi; Chân may xếp ly; Chân may dạo; Chân may viền túi; Chân may zig zag; Chân may khóa kéo; Khác